Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.297

Third-party residential mortgage loan modification services providers—Duties—Restrictions.

(1) In addition to complying with federal law and all requirements for loan originators under this chapter, third-party residential mortgage loan modification services providers must:

(a) Provide a written disclosure summary as described in RCW 31.04.293;

(b) Not receive advance fees;

(c) Not charge total fees in excess of usual and customary charges, or total fees that are not reasonable in light of the service provided; and

(d) Immediately inform the borrower in writing if the owner of the loan requires additional information from the borrower, or if it becomes apparent that a residential mortgage loan modification is not possible.

(2) As a condition for providing a loan modification or loan modification services, third-party residential mortgage loan modification services providers and individuals servicing a residential mortgage loan must not require or encourage a borrower to:

(a) Sign a waiver of his or her legal defenses, counterclaims, and other legal rights against the servicer for future acts;

(b) Sign a waiver of his or her right to contest a future foreclosure;

(c) Waive his or her right to receive notice before the owner or servicer of the loan initiates foreclosure proceedings;

(d) Agree to pay charges not enumerated in any agreement between the borrower and the lender, servicer, or owner of the loan; or

(e) Cease communication with the lender, investor, or loan servicer.

(3) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a violation of RCW 19.144.080.

[ 2013 c 29 s 12; 2010 c 35 s 11.]